Hawaii, session 2026, HB1835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 514B-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "association" to read as follows: ""Association" means the unit owners' association organized under section 514B-102 or under prior condominium property regime statutes[.] or an "association" as defined in section 421J-2." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________